Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7287.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 42-9-2 and 42-9-19.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-9 entitled
"Department of Attorney General" are hereby amended to read as follows:
42-9-2. Powers and duties of department — Division of juvenile prosecution
established.
(a) The attorney general, the assistant attorneys general, and those special assistant
attorneys general who have been designated by the attorney general, shall exercise the powers and
duties prescribed in and shall enforce the provisions of this chapter and of §§ 12-1-4 — 12-1-12,
and in all other provisions of the general laws and public laws insofar as they relate to the powers
and duties of the attorney general. The attorney general shall file notice with the secretary of state
and the clerk of the superior court. The attorney general, assistant attorneys general, and those
special assistant attorneys general shall only have, and be limited by, the powers and duties
prescribed to them by the general and public laws.
(b) There shall be established within the department of attorney general a division of
juvenile prosecution which shall prosecute all delinquency petitions based on the commission of
any offense which if committed by an adult would constitute a capital offense, all delinquency
petitions based on the commission of an offense which if committed by an adult would constitute
the offense of assault with intent to commit a capital offense, all delinquency petitions based upon
the commission of an offense which if committed by an adult would constitute the offense of

manslaughter, and all assault offenses which if committed by an adult would constitute a felony.
The division of juvenile prosecution shall also have jurisdiction to file petitions pursuant to §§ 14-
1-7 and 14-1-7.1.
42-9-19.1. Acceptance of settlements — Non-multi-state initiatives — Attorney
general settlement restricted account.
(a) There is hereby established a restricted receipt account within the department of
attorney general entitled “attorney general non-multi-state initiative restricted-receipt account.”
Funds consisting of attorneys’ fees previously recovered pursuant to the Distributors — Rhode
Island Settlement Agreement resolving opioid-related claims against McKesson Corporation,
Cardinal Health, Inc., and/or AmerisourceBergen Corporation in the case State of Rhode Island v.
Purdue Pharma L.P. et al., CA No. PC-2018-4455, shall be deposited into this restricted receipt
account.
(b) The following funds shall also be deposited into this restricted receipt account:
(1) All future attorneys’ fees recovered from the case referenced in subsection (a) of this
section; and
(2) Twenty percent (20%) of attorneys’ fees recovered in other non-multi-state initiatives.
(c) This restricted receipt account shall be used to pay for staff and other operational
expenses of the department.
(d) Expenditures from this restricted receipt account shall be subject to the annual
appropriation process and approval by the general assembly.
(e) All settlement proceeds from non-multi-state initiatives, except those deposited in this
restricted receipt account pursuant to this section, shall be deposited into the general fund. No
settlement proceeds shall be directed or appropriated to any party without the express authorization
of the general assembly.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004277
========
LC004277 - Page 2 of 3